Oklahoma, session 2025, SB903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5009.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5009.2. A. The Advisory Committee on Medical Care for
Public Assistance Recipients, created by the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority pursuant to 42 Code of Federal Regulations, Section
431.12, for the purpose of advising the Authority about health and
medical care services, shall include among its membership of no more
than fifteen (15) sixteen (16) the following:
1. Board-certified physicians and other representatives of the
health professions who are familiar with the medical needs of low-
income population groups and with the resources available and
required for their care. The Advisory Committee shall, at all
times, include at least one physician from each of the six classes
ENGR. S. B. NO. 903 Page 1

of p hysicians listed in Section 725.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. All such physicians and other representatives of the
health professions shall be participating providers in the State
Medicaid Plan;
2. Members of consumers’ groups, including, but not limited to:
a. Medicaid recipients, and
b. representatives from consumer organizations including
a member representing nursing homes, a member
representing individuals with developmental
disabilities and a member representing one or more
behavioral health professions;
3. The Director of the Department of Human Services or
designee;
4. The Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services or designee;
5. A member approved and appointed by a state organization or
state chapter of a national organization of pediatricians dedicated
to the health, safety and well-being of infants, children,
adolescents and young adults, who shall:
a. monitor provider relations with the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority, and
b. create a forum to address grievances; and


ENGR. S. B. NO. 903 Page 2

6. A member who is a member or citizen of a federally
recognized American Indian tribe or nation whose primary tribal
headquarters is located in this state; and
7. A member representing a contracted entity as defined in
Section 4002.2 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes or a health plan
association representing more than one such contracted entity.
Beginning on January 1, 2022, appointments made to the Advisory
Committee shall be for a duration not to exceed four (4) consecutive
calendar years.
B. The Advisory Committee shall meet bimonthly to review and
make recommendations related to:
1. Policy development and program administration;
2. Policy changes proposed by the Authority prior to
consideration of such changes by the Authority;
3. Financial concerns related to the Authority and the
administration of the programs under the Authority; and
4. Other pertinent information related to the management and
operation of the Authority and the delivery of health and medical
care services.
C. 1. The Administrator of the Authority shall provide such
staff support and independent technical assistance as needed by the
Advisory Committee to enable the Advisory Committee to make
effective recommendations.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 903 Page 3

2. The Advisory Committee shall elect from among its members a
chair and a vice-chair vice chair who shall serve one-year terms. A
member may serve more than one (1), but not more than four (4),
consecutive one-year terms as chair or vice-chair vice chair. A
majority of the members of the Advisory Committee shall constitute a
quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall impair the right
of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the
Advisory Committee.
3. Members shall not receive any compensation for their
services but shall be reimbursed pursuant to the provisions of the
State Travel Reimbursement Act, Section 500.1 et seq. of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. The Authority shall give due consideration to the comments
and recommendations of the Advisory Committee in the Authority’s
deliberations on policies, administration, management and operation
of the Authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. S. B. NO. 903 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 26th day of February, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 903 Page 5